Nevada, session 83, AB262.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.2175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.2175 1. The county clerk may appoint a pupil as a
trainee for the position of election board officer. To qualify for such
an appointment, the pupil must be:
(a) A United States citizen, a resident of Nevada and a resident
of the county in which the pupil serves;
(b) Enrolled in high school; and
(c) At the time of service, at least 16 years of age.
2. The county clerk may only appoint a pupil as a trainee if:
(a) The pupil is appointed without party affiliation;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) The county clerk sends the pupil a certificate stating the date
and hours that the pupil will act as a trainee;
(c) At least 20 days before the election in which the pupil will
act as a trainee, the principal of the high school or the pupil’s
assigned school counselor receives the county clerk’s certificate and
a written request signed by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be
excused from school for the time specified in the certificate;
(d) The principal of the high school or the assigned school
counselor of the pupil approves the pupil’s request; and
(e) The pupil attends the training class required by
NRS 293B.260.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the county
clerk may assign a trainee such duties as the county clerk deems
appropriate. The county clerk shall not require the trainee to perform
those duties later than 10 p.m. or any applicable curfew, whichever
is earlier.
4. The county clerk may compensate a trainee for service at the
same rate fixed for election board officers generally [.] unless the
trainee chooses to perform the duties described in this section as a
volunteer who receives no compensation.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.460 1. The compensation of voting board officers,
counting board officers, specially appointed deputy sheriffs, election
board officers and other employees must be fixed by county or city
ordinance, resolution or order.
2. A voting board officer, counting board officer or election
board officer who is eligible to receive compensation fixed
pursuant to this section may choose to work in such a position as a
volunteer who receives no compensation.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 293C.222 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.222 1. The city clerk may appoint a pupil as a trainee
for the position of election board officer. To qualify for such an
appointment, the pupil must be:
(a) A United States citizen, a resident of Nevada and a resident
of the city in which the pupil serves;
(b) Enrolled in high school; and
(c) At the time of service, at least 16 years of age.
2. The city clerk may only appoint a pupil as a trainee if:
(a) The pupil is appointed without party affiliation;
(b) The city clerk sends the pupil a certificate stating the date
and hours that the pupil will act as a trainee;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) At least 20 days before the election in which the pupil will
act as a trainee, the principal of the high school or the assigned
school counselor of the pupil receives the city clerk’s certificate and
a written request signed by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be
excused from school for the time specified in the certificate;
(d) The principal of the high school or the assigned school
counselor of the pupil approves the pupil’s request; and
(e) The pupil attends the training class required by
NRS 293B.260.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the city
clerk may assign a trainee such duties as the city clerk deems
appropriate. The city clerk shall not require the trainee to perform
those duties later than 10 p.m., or any applicable curfew, whichever
is earlier.
4. The city clerk may compensate a trainee for service at the
same rate fixed for election board officers generally [.] unless the
trainee chooses to perform the duties described in this section as a
volunteer who receives no compensation.
Sec. 6. Section 5.130 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1417, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.130 Special elections: Consolidation of voting
precincts; qualification of voters; costs.
1. The City Clerk may consolidate or otherwise modify
voting precincts for any special municipal election and shall
designate the polling places, appoint the officers of the
election for each precinct in such number as he or she may
determine, and fix the respective duties and compensation of
those officers.
2. Any qualified elector who is properly registered is
qualified to vote at the special election.
3. The costs of any special election must be paid by the
City.
4. An officer of the election who is eligible to receive
compensation fixed pursuant to subsection 1 may choose to
work in such a position as a volunteer who receives no
compensation.
Sec. 7. Section 21 of the Airport Authority Act for Battle
Mountain, being chapter 458, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page
1214, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 21. 1. Subject to the provisions of NRS 350.011
to 350.0165, inclusive, whenever the Board determines, by
resolution, that the interest of the Authority and the public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
interest or necessity demand the issue of general obligation
bonds to purchase, construct, or otherwise acquire, maintain,
improve or equip airports, the Board shall order the
submission of the proposition of issuing such bonds to the
registered voters of the Authority at an election held for that
purpose in the manner provided by NRS 350.020 to 350.070,
inclusive.
2. Any such election may be held separately, or may be
consolidated or held concurrently with any other election
authorized by law.
3. The declaration of public interest or necessity
required by this section and the provision for the holding of
such election may be included within one and the same
resolution, which resolution, in addition to the declaration of
public interest or necessity, must:
(a) Recite the objects and purposes for which the
indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of
the works or improvements, as the case may be, the
maximum amount of principal of the indebtedness to be
incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid
on the indebtedness.
(b) Fix the date upon which the election will be held and
the manner of holding it and the method of voting for or
against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness.
(c) Fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the
election, designate the polling place and appoint, for each
polling place from the electors of the Authority, three officers
of the election, one of whom shall act as clerk.
4. An officer of the election who is eligible to receive
compensation fixed pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection
3 may choose to work in such a position as a volunteer who
receives no compensation.
Sec. 8. Section 15 of the Airport Authority Act for Carson
City, being chapter 844, Statutes of Nevada 1989, as amended by
chapter 345, Statutes of Nevada 1993, at page 1094, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 15. 1. Subject to the approval of the Board of
Supervisors and the provisions of NRS 350.011 to 350.0165,
inclusive, whenever the Board determines, by resolution, that
the public interest or necessity requires the issuance of
general obligation bonds to purchase, construct, acquire,
maintain, improve or equip an airport, the Board shall submit
the proposition to the voters at a special election or the next
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
primary or general election held pursuant to NRS 350.020 to
350.070, inclusive.
2. A special election may be held only if the Board of
Supervisors determines, by a unanimous vote, that an
emergency exists. The determination made by the Board of
Supervisors is conclusive unless it is shown that the Board of
Supervisors acted with fraud or a gross abuse of discretion.
An action to challenge the determination made by the Board
of Supervisors must be commenced within 15 days after the
Board’s determination is final. As used in this subsection,
“emergency” means any unexpected occurrence or
combination of occurrences which requires immediate action
by the Board of Supervisors to prevent or mitigate a
substantial financial loss to the Authority or Carson City or to
enable the Board of Supervisors to provide an essential
service to the residents of Carson City.
3. The declaration of public interest or necessity
required by this section and the provision for holding the
election may be included in one resolution which, in addition
to the declaration of public interest or necessity, must:
(a) Recite the objects and purposes for which the
indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of
the works or improvements, the maximum amount of
principal of the indebtedness and the maximum rate
of interest to be paid.
(b) Include the date upon which the election will be held
and describe the method of voting for or against the proposed
indebtedness.
(c) Fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the
election, designate the polling place and appoint, for each
polling place from the registered voters of Carson City, three
officers of the election, one of whom shall act as clerk.
4. An officer of the election who is eligible to receive
compensation fixed pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection
3 may choose to work in such a position as a volunteer who
receives no compensation.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)